zh-TW: 模型火箭級數配置: 多節 (4 節以上); 單節; 三節; 兩節; 其他
de: Stufensystem der Modellrakete: Mehrstufig (4+ Stufen); Einstufig; Dreistufig; Zweistufig; Sonstige
tr: Model roket aşamalandırması: Çok kademeli (4+ kademe); Tek kademeli; Üç kademeli; İki kademeli; Diğer
nl: Modelraket trappen: Meertraps (4+ trappen); Eentraps; Drietraps; Tweetraps; Overig
pl: Stopniowanie rakiety modelarskiej: Wielostopniowa (4 i więcej stopni); Jednostopniowa; Trzystopniowa; Dwustopniowa; Inne
sv: Modellraket – stegkonstruktion: Flersteg (4+ steg); Ensteg; Tresteg; Tvåsteg; Annat
it: Stadi del razzo modellistico: Multistadio (4+ stadi); Monostadio; A tre stadi; A due stadi; Altro
cs: Stupně modelu rakety: Vícestupňová (4+ stupňů); Jednostupňová; Třístupňová; Dvoustupňová; Jiné
bg-BG: Посочва броя и вида на степените (етапите) при моделните ракети: Многостепенна (4+ степени); Едностепенна; Тристепенна; Двустепенна; Друго
lt-LT: Modelinės raketos pakopų skaičius: Daugiapakopė (4+ pakopos); Vienapakopė; Tripakopė; Dvipakopė; Kita
ko: 모형 로켓 단: 다단계(4단계 이상); 단일 단계; 3단계; 2단계; 기타
ru: Ступенчатость модели ракеты: Многоступенчатая (4 и более ступеней); Одноступенчатая; Трехступенчатая; Двухступенчатая; Другое
zh-CN: 模型火箭级数: 多级（4 级及以上）; 单级; 三级; 两级; 其他
vi: Tên lửa mô hình phân tầng: Nhiều tầng (4 tầng trở lên); Đơn tầng; Ba tầng; Hai tầng; Khác
nb: Modellrakett-trinn: Flere trinn (4+ trinn); Ett trinn; Tre trinn; To trinn; Annet
pt-PT: estágios de foguete modelo: Vários estágios (mais de 4 estágios); Estágio único; Três estágios; Dois estágios; Outro
hu: Modellrakéta szakaszai: Többfokozatú (4+ fokozat); Egyfokozatú; Háromfokozatú; Kétfokozatú; Egyéb
th: การจัดเตรียมจรวดจำลอง: หลายท่อน (4 ท่อนขึ้นไป); ท่อนเดียว; สามท่อน; สองท่อน; อื่นๆ
fr: Étages de la fusée miniature: Multi-étage (plus de 4 étages); Mono-étage; À trois étages; À deux étages; Autre
ja: モデルロケットのステージ: マルチステージ (4段以上); シングルステージ; 3段式; 2段式; その他
ro-RO: Numărul de etape al rachetei de modelism: Mai multe trepte (4+ trepte); O singură treaptă; Trei trepte; Două trepte; Altele
sl-SI: Stopnjevitost modelne rakete: Večstopenjsko (4+ stopenj); Enostopenjsko; Tristopenjsko; Dvostopenjsko; Drugo
fi: Pienoismalliraketin vaiheistus: Monivaiheinen (yli 4 vaihetta); Yksivaiheinen; Kolmivaiheinen; Kaksivaiheinen; Muu
en: Model rocket staging: Multi-stage (4+ stages); Single-stage; Three-stage; Two-stage; Other
es: Etapas del cohete de modelismo: Multietapa (4+ etapas); Una sola etapa; Tres etapas; Dos etapas; Otro
hr-HR: Odvajanje modela rakete: Višestupanjski (4 ili više stupnjeva); Jednostupanjski; Trostupanjski; Dvostupanjski; Ostalo
sk-SK: Model raketového stupňa: Viacstupňové (4+ stupňov); Jednostupňové; Trojstupňové; Dvojstupňové; Iné
da: Modelrakets trin: Flere trin (4+ trin); Enkelt trin; Tre trin; To trin; Andet
pt-BR: Foguete de modelismo estagiamento: Multiestágio (mais de 4 estágios); Estágio único; Três estágios; Dois estágios; Outro
el: Διάταξη σταδίων μοντέλου πυραύλου: Πολλαπλών σταδίων (4+ στάδια); Μονού σταδίου; Τριών σταδίων; Δύο σταδίων; Άλλο